New Jersey, session 222, S2840.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  In addition to any requirements that may be established by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, the Division of Veterans Healthcare Services in the Department of Military and Veterans Affairs shall develop and maintain emergency preparedness and response plans tailored to Veterans Memorial Homes in this State.  At a minimum, such plans shall: (1)  identify potential crises and situations which may constitute an emergency, and the unique challenges that face Veterans Memorial Homes in such emergencies; (2)  provide a list of necessary items and steps to undertake in response to such emergencies; (3)  establish standardized protocols for all Veterans Memorial Homes to implement in the case of an emergency, and guidelines on how and when to simulate or train for such emergencies; and (4)  develop a system and set of procedures to ensure the timely dissemination of information to residents, families, and staff. b.    As used in this section, emergency means any condition which interferes with the conduct of normal operations or compromises the standard of care typically provided at a Veterans Memorial Home. c.     Nothing in this section shall be construed to supersede or to conflict with any applicable federal or State laws, rules, or regulations. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.